Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.060

Appointment of members.

The Washington apple commission shall appoint producer members to positions one through five on the commission. The Washington state fruit commission shall appoint producer members to positions six through eight on the commission. The director shall appoint a producer who derives a substantial portion of his or her income from the production of winter pears.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6028; 1969 c 129 s 6.]